Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.020

Action—Commencement—Fee.

A small claims action shall be commenced by the plaintiff filing a claim, in the form prescribed by RCW 12.40.050, in the small claims department. A filing fee of thirty-five dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035 shall be paid when the claim is filed. Any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in such action shall pay to the court a filing fee of thirty-five dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. Fifty cents of every filing fee shall be deposited into the judicial stabilization trust account created in RCW 43.79.505 and used to fund indigent defense through the office of public defense. Fifty cents of every filing fee shall be deposited into the crime victims' compensation account created in RCW 7.68.045 and used to assist crime victims.

[ 2019 c 251 s 1; 2011 1st sp.s. c 44 s 2; 2009 c 572 s 2; 2005 c 457 s 14; 1990 c 172 s 3; 1984 c 258 s 58; 1919 c 187 s 2; RRS s 1777-2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 3.62.020.

Effective date—2009 c 572: See note following RCW 43.79.505.

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.

Effective date—1990 c 172: See note following RCW 7.75.035.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.